Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
BOARD POWERS AND DUTIES

[§87A-15] Administration of the fund.
The board shall administer and carry out the purpose of the fund. Health and
other benefit plans shall be provided at a cost affordable to both the public
employers and the public employees. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next